Utah statutes.
53A-11-1303.   Immunity from civil or criminal liability.
Any person, official, or institution, other than a law enforcement officer or
law enforcement agency, participating in good faith in making a report or
conducting an investigation under the direction of school or law enforcement
authorities under this part, is immune from any liability, civil or criminal,
that otherwise might result by reason of that action.
